Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 29
SAFETY APPLIANCES

Section

40-29-101. Switch lights.

Any railroad or railway company owning or operating within this state any line or branch of railroad connecting with any main line of railroad by means of a switch shall provide such switch with a reflector signal or with a suitable light such as is commonly used for such purposes and, if a light is provided, shall keep the same lighted from sunset on each and every calendar day of the year until sunrise on the following day.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 405, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5504.

C.L.

§ 2882.

CSA:

C. 139, § 68.

L. 45:

p. 545, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-1.

40-29-102. Violation - penalty.

Any railroad or railway company which violates, or permits to be violated, any of the provisions of section 40-29-101, or any officer, agent, or employee of such railroad or railway company who violates, or permits to be violated, any of the provisions of said section shall be fined not more than three hundred dollars for each violation.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 405, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5505.

C.L.

§ 2883.

CSA:

C. 139, § 69.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-2.

40-29-103. Jurisdiction of county courts.

The county court has jurisdiction of any offense under sections 40-29-101 and 40-29-102.

Source:

L. 03:

p. 405, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 5506.

C.L.

§ 2884.

CSA:

C. 139, § 70.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-3.

L. 64:

p. 307, § 267.

40-29-104. Blocking switch rails, guardrails, wing rails, and split rails. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1897:

p. 258, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5507.

C.L.

§ 2885.

CSA:

C. 139, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-4.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-105. Prima facie evidence of neglect. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1897:

p. 258, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5508.

C.L.

§ 2886.

CSA:

C. 139, § 72.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-5.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-106. Locomotive headlights - exceptions.

It is the duty of every railroad corporation, receiver, or lessee thereof operating any line of railroad in this state to equip all locomotive engines used in the transportation of trains over said railroad with headlights of not less than twelve hundred candle power, measured without the aid of a reflector; but this section and section 40-29-107 shall not apply to locomotive engines which are regularly employed in yard service, known as switch engines; engines running for a distance of not more than sixteen miles within the limits of this state to complete their runs; those used exclusively between sunrise and sunset; nor engines going to or returning from repair shops when ordered to such shops for repair.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 516, § 1.

C.L.

§ 2887.

CSA:

C. 139, § 73.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-6.

40-29-107. Violation - penalty.

Any railroad company or the receiver or lessee thereof doing business in the state of Colorado which violates the provisions of section 40-29-106 shall be liable to the state of Colorado for a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for each and every locomotive not so equipped, counting each train hauled by such locomotive a separate and distinct offense, and such penalties shall be recovered and suit brought in the name of the state of Colorado in a court of proper jurisdiction in any county in or through which such line of railroad may be operated.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 516, § 2.

C.L.

§ 2888.

CSA:

C. 139, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-7.

40-29-108. Track motorcars - lights, windshield, and wiper - top. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 601, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-8.

L. 59:

p. 634, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-8.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-109. Violations - penalty - exception. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 602, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-9.

L. 59:

p. 635, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-9.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-110. Duties of commission.

For the purpose of protecting the health and safety of employees of railroads, the public utilities commission of Colorado shall prescribe standards of safety.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 603, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-10.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 219, § 9, effective March 29.

40-29-111. Compliance.

It is the duty of all persons engaged in the operation of railroads to comply with any regulation or order of the commission issued under the provisions of section 40-29-110 and to furnish any information required by the commission for purposes of section 40-29-110. The provisions of said section shall not apply to any caboose operated on tracks of less than standard gauge nor to any caboose used only in yard service.

The commission or its authorized agent may, during reasonable hours, enter the place of operation of any person engaged in the operation of railroads for the purpose of ascertaining whether the standards prescribed by authority of section 40-29-110 are being complied with.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 603, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-11.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 219, § 10, effective March 29.

40-29-112. Complaint - hearing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 604, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-12.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-113. Order. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 604, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-13.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-114. Penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 604, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-14.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-115. Extension of time. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 57:

p. 604, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 116-10-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-10-15.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-29-116. Highway-rail crossing signalization fund created - annual appropriation.

The highway-rail crossing signalization fund is hereby created in the state treasury, in order to promote the public safety and to provide for the payment of the costs of installing, reconstructing, and improving automatic and other safety appliance signals or devices at crossings at grade of public highways or roads over the tracks of any railroad or street railway corporation in this state. None of the moneys in the highway-rail crossing signalization fund shall be used to pay any part of the cost of the installation, reconstruction, or improvement of any such signals or devices at any crossing when any part of such cost will be paid from moneys available under any federal or federal-aid highway act.

For the 2016-17 fiscal year, the sum of two hundred forty thousand dollars is appropriated from the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., to the highway-rail crossing signalization fund as authorized by section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(VI), C.R.S. Pursuant to section 40-2-114 (1)(a)(II), for the 2017-18 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the lesser of three percent of the fees collected under section 40-2-113 or an amount of the fees equal to two hundred forty thousand dollars plus a cumulative inflation adjustment of two percent for each fiscal year beginning with the 2017-18 fiscal year is credited to the highway-rail crossing signalization fund. Notwithstanding section 24-36-114 (1), C.R.S., any interest earned on the deposit and investment of moneys in the highway-rail crossing signalization fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund. Such earned interest moneys are hereby continuously appropriated to the public utilities commission for use for the purposes of the highway-rail crossing signalization fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, on July 1, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer one million seven thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars from the highway-rail crossing signalization fund to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1701, § 10, effective May 14.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1807, § 34, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-087), ch. 217, p. 832, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2020:

(3) added, (HB 20-1406), ch. 178, p. 814, § 22, effective June 29.